Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201471-1930
Licenses; expiration date; not transferable
or assignable; public inspection and display.

(1) Except as otherwise provided in the Children's
Residential Facilities and Placing Licensure Act:

(a) Licenses
issued under the act shall expire on uniform annual dates established by the
department specified in rules and regulations; and

(b) Licenses shall be issued
only for the premises and individuals named in the application and shall not
be transferable or assignable.

(2) Licenses, license record information,
and inspection reports shall be made available by the licensee for public
inspection upon request and may be displayed in a conspicuous place on the
licensed premises.

Laws 2013, LB265, § 7.